Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1125
Special education, defined.

Special education means specially designed instruction, at no cost to parents or guardians, to meet the unique needs of a child with a disability, including classroom instruction, instruction in physical education, home instruction, and instruction in hospitals and institutions. Special education includes speech-language pathology, occupational therapy, and physical therapy if the speech-language pathology or occupational or physical therapy consists of specially designed instruction, at no cost to the parents or guardians, to meet the unique needs of a child with a disability.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3314;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 807;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 43.